Tennessee, session 114, HB1103.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. This act is known and may be cited as the "Tennessee for Tampons Act."
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 7, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) As used in this section, "feminine hygiene product":
(1) Means any product to be used by women with respect to
menstruation or other genital-tract secretions; and
(2) Includes tampons and sanitary napkins.
(b) Public institutions of higher education shall provide feminine hygiene
products in all women's and girl's bathrooms and locker rooms.
HB1103
002298
- 1 -

(c) Public institutions of higher education shall collaborate with the institution's
student governments and building maintenance managers for the administration and
restocking of feminine hygiene products in all women's and girl's bathrooms and locker
rooms at the institution.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 002298